Idaho statutes. Title 22 AGRICULTURE AND HORTICULTURE
Chapter 27
SOIL CONSERVATION DISTRICTS

Sec.

§ 22-2701, 22-2702. Legislative intent — Definitions. [Null and Void.]

§ 22-2703 — 22-2713. Soil Conservation Districts Law of 1939. [Repealed.]

§ 22-2714. Payments of federal aid to various counties by state controller.

The state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw his warrant in favor of the counties to whom payment should be made pursuant to the Act of Congress of July 24, 1946 (60 Stat. 642, 33 U.S.C.A. 701-C-3 [33 U.S.C. § 701c-3]) and forward the same to the treasurer of the county to which such funds are allocated under the terms of the aforementioned federal statute, to be by the treasurer of said county deposited in the public school fund of said county.

History.

1953, ch. 157, § 1, p. 252; am. 1994, ch. 180, § 19, p. 420.

§ 22-2715. Short title.

This act may be known and cited as the soil conservation district law.

History.

1957, ch. 218, § 1, p. 476.

§ 22-2716. Legislative determination and declaration of policy.

It is the determination of the state of Idaho that:

Forest lands, rangelands and agricultural lands maintained in a healthy condition are a legitimate land use contributing to the economic, social and environmental well-being of the state and its citizens;

It is essential to the general welfare of all citizens of this state that multiple use conservation improvements be implemented on a broader scale on both public and private lands;

Due to numerous economic and practical issues relating to the improvements of individual tracts of land, both public and private resource conservation improvements, projects and programs of the nature contemplated by this chapter would enhance the economic productivity and environmental quality of the state; and

It is sound public policy for the state of Idaho to provide for accounts to finance loans, grants, cost-share funding and tax incentives to the end that forest lands, rangelands and agricultural lands within the state can provide the greatest benefit to all concerned.

It is the intent of the state of Idaho to provide a means by which funds, including federal, state, private and other moneys, can be obtained and utilized for the accelerated development of water quality programs, multiple use forest land, rangeland, and agricultural land conservation improvements in the state, and to provide that these improvements, projects and programs be locally planned, coordinated and implemented through statutory provisions pertaining to soil conservation districts, the state soil and water conservation commission, appropriate state and federal agencies and the owners and operators of privately owned lands.

It is in the best interest of the state of Idaho:

To emphasize nonregulatory, science-based technical assistance, incentive-based financial programs and informational and educational programs at the local level;

To maintain, preserve, conserve and rehabilitate forest lands, rangelands and agricultural lands to assure the protection and productivity of the state’s natural resources;

That soil conservation districts, as governmental subdivisions, and the state soil and water conservation commission, as a state agency, are the primary entities to provide assistance to private landowners and land users in the conservation, sustainment, improvement and enhancement of Idaho’s natural resources;

To establish policies for cooperative working relationships between local soil conservation districts, the state soil and water conservation commission, local, state and federal agencies and public and private groups to plan, develop and implement conservation goals and initiatives with local landowners and land users;

That soil conservation districts and the state soil and water conservation commission lead nonregulatory efforts to conserve, sustain, improve and enhance Idaho’s private and state lands and to provide assistance to private landowners and land users to plan, develop and implement conservation plans addressing soil, water, air, plant and animal resources. Technical, financial and educational assistance to landowners and land users is vital to that effort; and

That the state soil and water conservation commission provide support to soil conservation districts in the wise use and enhancement of soil, water and related resources.

It is the policy of the state of Idaho:

To provide appropriate tax policies and program mechanisms that provide incentives for private landowners and land users to voluntarily manage forest lands, rangelands and agricultural lands in a manner that promotes conservation;

That the health, safety and general welfare of the people of this state can be greatly enhanced by providing nonregulatory opportunities to landowners and land users in order to increase the ability of such landowners and land users to readily understand and plan for local, state and federal natural resource requirements and opportunities through technological innovation and processes;

To enhance natural resource productivity in order to promote a strong natural resource sector, reduce unintended adverse effects of resource development and use, protect individual and community health and safety and encourage stewardship;

That conservation plan implementation shall include best management practices implemented according to the standards and specifications developed by the United States department of agriculture natural resources conservation service (NRCS) as designated by the agricultural pollution abatement plan. Those practices shall include, but not be limited to: irrigation water management systems; prescribed grazing; forest stand improvement; establishment of grass, trees and shrubs to reduce wind and water erosion; promotion of sound community development; protection of water and air resources from agricultural nonpoint sources of impairment; maintenance, restoration or enhancement of wetlands and fish and wildlife habitat; protection of upstream watersheds from flood risk; and protection of watersheds from the effects of chronic water shortages and risks; and

That all conservation programs authorized pursuant to this chapter shall deliver services fairly and equitably, strengthen the conservation district delivery system, provide timely science-based information and provide conservation information and educational programs and experiences to youth and adults.

History.

I.C.,§ 22-2716, as added by 2003, ch. 107, § 2, p. 334; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 1, p. 719.

§ 22-2717. Definitions.

Whenever used or referred to in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

“Administrator” means the administrator for the Idaho state soil and water conservation commission.

“Agency” includes the government of this state and any subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the government of this state.

“Agricultural pollution abatement plan” or “ag plan” means the document developed by the state soil and water conservation commission and approved by the commission and the department of environmental quality, that provides appropriate technical, programmatic, informational and educational processes, guidelines and policies for addressing agricultural pollution.

“Best management practices” or “BMPs” means practices, techniques, or measures developed or identified by the designated agency and identified in the state water quality management plan which are determined to be a cost-effective and practicable means of preventing or reducing pollutants generated from nonpoint sources to a level compatible with water quality goals.

“Commission” or “state soil and water conservation commission” means the agency created in section 22-2718, Idaho Code.

“Conservation plan” means a description of identified natural resource issues and a specific schedule of implementation of component practices necessary to resolve those specific resource issues as agreed upon by the landowner.

“Designated agency” is as defined in section 39-3602, Idaho Code.

“District,” “conservation district,” “soil conservation district,” or “soil and water conservation district” means a governmental subdivision(s) of this state, and a public body corporate and politic, organized in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, for the purposes, with the powers and subject to the restrictions hereinafter set forth.

“Due notice” means notice published at least twice, with an interval of at least seven (7) days between the two (2) publication dates, in a newspaper or other publication of general circulation within the appropriate area, or if no such publication of general circulation be available, by posting at a reasonable number of conspicuous places within the appropriate area, such posting to include, where possible, posting at public places where it may be customary to post notices concerning county or municipal affairs generally. At any hearing held pursuant to such notice, at the time and place designated in such notice, adjournment may be made from time to time without the necessity of renewing such notice for such adjournment dates.

“Eligible applicant” means an individual agricultural owner, operator, partnership, corporation, conservation district, irrigation district, canal company or other agricultural or grazing interest.

“Government” or “governmental” includes the government of this state, the government of the United States, and any subdivisions, agency, or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of either of them.

“Idaho OnePlan” means a computer-based system for improving efficiency and effectiveness of natural resource planning by landowners and land users.

“Landowner” or “owner” includes any person, firm, or corporation who shall hold title to any lands lying within a district organized under the provisions of this chapter. A buyer on contract, who is the occupier of land, shall be construed as landowner.
(14) “Land user” means any entity with a lease, permit or similar business agreement with a landowner to implement, manage or utilize such land for activities related to use of the land.

(15) “Natural resources conservation service” or “NRCS” means the agency governed by the provisions of 16 U.S.C. sections 590a through 590d and 590f.

(16) “Nominating petition” means a petition filed under the provisions of section 22-2721, Idaho Code, to nominate candidates for the office of supervisor of a soil conservation district.

(17) “Participant” means an individual agricultural owner, operator, partnership, private corporation, conservation district, irrigation district, canal company, or other agricultural or grazing interest approved by the commission or an individual agricultural owner, operator, partnership, or private corporation approved for implementation of conservation improvements, projects, or the water quality program for agriculture.

(18) “Petition” means a petition filed under the provisions of subsection (1) of section 22-2719, Idaho Code, for the creation of a district.

(19) “Project sponsor” means a conservation district, irrigation district, canal company, or other agricultural or grazing interest, as determined appropriate by the commission, that enters into a conservation improvement or water quality project agreement with the commission.

(20) “Qualified elector” means any person who is qualified to vote pursuant to the requirements of section 34-104, Idaho Code.

(21) “Riparian land” means the beds of streams, the adjacent vegetation communities and the land thereunder, which are predominately influenced by their association with water and are privately owned.

(22) “Specifications” means the materials, operations and procedures necessary to obtain the desired standards of construction and installation.

(23) “Standards” means the minimum limits of technical excellence of a component practice for its planning, design and construction.

(24) “State” means the state of Idaho.

(25) “Supervisor” means one (1) of the members of the governing body of a district elected or appointed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(26) “Total maximum daily load” is as defined in section 39-3602, Idaho Code.

(27) “United States” or “agencies of the United States” includes the United States of America, the natural resources conservation service of the United States department of agriculture, and any other agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

History.

1957, ch. 218, § 3, p. 476; am. 1982, ch. 254, § 1, p. 646; am. 1995, ch. 118, § 7, p. 417; am. 1997, ch. 180, § 2, p. 498; am. 2000, ch. 160, § 2, p. 404; am. 2003, ch. 107, § 3, p. 334; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 2, p. 719.

§ 22-2718. Idaho state soil and water conservation commission.

There is hereby established and created in the department of agriculture of the state of Idaho the Idaho state soil and water conservation commission which shall perform all functions conferred upon it by this chapter and shall be a nonregulatory agency. The commission shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor. In appointing commission members, the governor shall give consideration to geographic representation. Commission members shall be chosen with due regard to their demonstrated expertise including, but not limited to, knowledge of and interest in water quality and other natural resource issues, production agriculture, banking or other similar financial experience or experience as a county commissioner. The soil and water conservation districts may submit to the governor a list of up to three (3) names for each vacancy on the commission and the governor may, in his discretion, consider any such submission in the appointment of commission members. The term of office of each commission member shall be five (5) years; except that upon July 1, 2010, the governor shall appoint one (1) member for a term of one (1) year, one (1) member for a term of two (2) years, one (1) member for a term of three (3) years, one (1) member for a term of four (4) years and one (1) member for a term of five (5) years. From and after the initial appointment the governor shall appoint a member of the commission to serve in office for a term of five (5) years commencing upon July 1 of that year. A vacancy which occurs in an unexpired term shall be filled for its remainder by the governor’s appointment. Each vacancy on the commission shall be filled by appointment by the governor. Such appointments shall be confirmed by the senate. Commission members shall serve at the pleasure of the governor. The commission may invite the state conservationist of the United States department of agriculture natural resources conservation service, a representative from a district or districts and the dean of the college of agriculture of the university of Idaho or his designated representative, or any other person or entity as the commission deems appropriate, to serve as nonvoting advisory members of the commission. The commission shall keep a record of its official actions, shall adopt a seal, which seal shall be judicially noticed, and may perform such acts, hold such public hearings and promulgate such rules as may be necessary for the execution of its functions under this chapter.

The state soil and water conservation commission shall appoint the administrator of the state soil and water conservation commission. The state soil and water conservation commission may employ such technical experts and such other agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and shall determine their qualifications, duties and compensation. The commission may call upon the attorney general of the state for such legal services as it may require. It shall have authority to delegate to its chairman, to one (1) or more of its members, or to one (1) or more agents or employees, such powers and duties as it may deem proper. The commission may establish offices, incur expenses, enter into contracts and acquire services and personal property as may be reasonable for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter. Upon request of the commission, for the purpose of carrying out any of its functions, the supervising officer of any state agency, or of any state institution of learning, shall insofar as may be possible under available appropriation, and having due regard to the needs of the agency to which the request is directed, assign or detail to the commission members of the staff or personnel of such agency or institution of learning, and make such special reports, surveys or studies as the commission may request.

The commission shall designate its chairman, and may from time to time, change such designation. A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum and the concurrency of a majority in any matter within their duties shall be required for its determination. The chairman and members of the commission shall be compensated as provided by section 59-509(h), Idaho Code. The commission shall provide for the execution of surety bonds for all employees and officers who shall be entrusted with funds or property; shall provide for the keeping of a full and accurate record of all proceedings and of all resolutions, and orders issued or adopted; and shall provide for a periodic management review of the accounts of receipts and disbursements as determined by the legislative auditor pursuant to section 67-702, Idaho Code.

In addition to the duties and powers hereinafter conferred upon the state soil and water conservation commission, it shall have the following responsibilities:

To offer such assistance as may be appropriate to the supervisors of soil conservation districts in the carrying out of any of their powers and programs.

To keep the supervisors of each of the several soil conservation districts informed of the activities and experience of all other soil conservation districts and to facilitate an interchange of advice and experience between such districts and cooperation between them.

To coordinate the progress of the several soil conservation districts so far as this may be done by advice and consultation.

To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States and any of its agencies, and of agencies of this state, in the work of such districts.

To disseminate information throughout the state concerning the activities and programs of the soil conservation districts in areas where their organization is desirable.

To provide for the establishment and encouragement of the “Idaho OnePlan” as a primary computer-based conservation planning process for all natural resource concerns. Establishment and encouragement will be accomplished through an executive group and steering committee both containing private, state and federal representation. The information provided by those using the “Idaho OnePlan” shall be deemed to be trade secrets, production records or other proprietary information and shall be kept confidential and shall be exempt from disclosure pursuant to section 74-107, Idaho Code.

In addition to other powers, functions and duties of soil conservation districts and the state soil and water conservation commission provided in this chapter, the commission shall have the following additional powers, functions and duties:

The commission shall conduct, in cooperation with appropriate federal and state agencies and the owners and operators of privately owned forest lands, rangelands and agricultural lands in this state, conservation improvements on or in respect to these lands for the purposes of implementing conservation systems to conserve and improve natural resource conditions;

The commission shall assist and advise soil conservation districts and other entities in implementing the conservation improvements, projects and the water quality program for agriculture. To the extent that there are available general funds, the commission shall provide for grants and cost-share opportunities and, as legislatively designated, utilize the resource conservation and rangeland development fund for loans for conservation improvements. Provided however, that the commission shall determine whether general or resource conservation and rangeland development funds are available before approving any conservation improvements, projects and cost-share opportunities and, after having made such determination, shall enter into the necessary contracts for implementation;

The commission shall be the agency responsible for the administration of funds accruing to the resource conservation and rangeland development fund and for all general funds appropriated as a separate and distinct action of the legislature to implement the powers, functions and duties of soil conservation districts and the commission;

On or before March 1 of each year, the commission shall report to the senate agricultural affairs committee and the house agricultural affairs committee; and

The commission shall promulgate such rules as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

1957, ch. 218, § 4, p. 476; am. 1967, ch. 28, § 1, p. 48; am. 1971, ch. 100, § 1, p. 215; am. 1974, ch. 17, § 2, p. 308; am. 1980, ch. 247, § 10, p. 582; am. 1989, ch. 109, § 1, p. 250; am. 1997, ch. 180, § 3, p. 498; am. 2000, ch. 160, § 3, p. 404; am. 2003, ch. 107, § 4, p. 334; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 3, p. 719; am. 2015, ch. 141, § 33, p. 379; am. 2017, ch. 130, § 1, p. 304.

§ 22-2719. Creation of soil conservation districts.

Any twenty-five (25) owners of land lying within the limits of the territory proposed to be organized into a district may file a petition with the state soil and water conservation commission asking that a soil conservation district be organized to function in the territory described in the petition. Such petition shall set forth:

The proposed name of said district;

That there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for a soil conservation district to function in the territory described in the petition;

A description of the territory proposed to be organized as a district, which description shall not be required to be given by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, but shall be deemed sufficient if generally accurate;

A request that the state soil and water conservation commission duly define the boundaries for such district; that a referendum be held within the territory so defined on the question of the creation of a soil conservation district in such territory; and that the commission determine that such a district be created.

Within thirty (30) days after such petition has been filed with the state soil and water conservation commission, it shall cause due notice to be given of a proposed hearing upon the question of the desirability and necessity, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, of the creation of such district, upon the question of the appropriate boundaries to be assigned to such district, upon the propriety of the petition and other proceedings taken under this chapter, and upon all questions relevant to such inquiries. All owners of land within the limits of the territory described in the petition, and of lands within any territory considered for addition to such described territory, and all other interested parties, shall have the right to attend such hearings and to be heard. If it shall appear upon the hearing that it may be desirable to include within the proposed district territory outside of the area within which due notice of the hearing has been given the hearing shall be adjourned and the due notice of further hearing shall be given throughout the entire area considered for inclusion in the district, and such further hearing held. After such hearing, if the commission shall determine upon the facts presented at such hearing and upon such other relevant facts and information as may be available, that there is need in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for a soil conservation district to function in the territory considered at the hearing, it shall make and record such determination, and shall define by metes and bounds or by legal subdivisions, the boundaries of such district. In making such determination and in defining such boundaries, the commission shall give due weight and consideration to the topography of the area considered and of the state, the composition of soils therein, the distribution of erosion, the prevailing land use practices, the desirability and necessity of including within the boundaries the particular lands under consideration and the benefits such lands may receive from being included within such boundaries, the relation of the proposed area to the existing watersheds and agricultural regions, and to other soil conservation districts already organized or proposed for organization under the provisions of this chapter, and such other physical, geographical, and economic factors as are relevant, having due regard to the legislature determinations set forth in section 22-2716, Idaho Code. The territory to be included within such boundaries need not be contiguous. If the commission determines after such hearing, after due consideration of the said relevant facts, that there is no need for a soil conservation district to function in the territory considered at the hearing, it shall make and record such determination and shall deny the petition. After six (6) months shall have expired from the date of the denial of such petition, subsequent petitions covering the same or substantially the same territory may be filed as aforesaid and new hearings held and determinations made thereon.

After the commission has made and recorded a determination that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for the organization of a district in a particular territory and has defined the boundaries thereof, it shall consider the question whether the operation of a district within such boundaries with the powers conferred upon soil conservation districts in this chapter is administratively practicable and feasible. To assist the commission in the determination of such administrative practicability and feasibility, it shall be the duty of the commission, at the next election held after entry of the finding that there is need for the organization of the proposed district and the determination of the boundaries thereof, to hold a referendum, subject to the provisions of section 34-106, Idaho Code, within the proposed district upon the proposition of the creation of the district, and to cause notice of such election to be given as provided in section 34-1406, Idaho Code. The question shall be submitted by ballots upon which the words “For creation of a soil conservation district of the lands below described and lying in the county(ies) of .... and ....” and “Against creation of a soil conservation district of the lands below described and lying in the county(ies) of .... and ....” shall appear, with a square before each proposition and a direction to insert an X mark in the square before one or the other of said propositions as the voter may favor or oppose creation of such district. The ballot shall set forth the boundaries of such proposed district as determined by the commission. All qualified electors who own lands or reside within the proposed district shall be eligible to vote in said referendum.

The commission shall pay all expenses for the issuance of such notice and the conduct of such hearings and election and shall supervise the conduct of such hearings and election. It shall issue appropriate regulations governing the conduct of such hearings and election. No informalities in the conduct of the election or in any matter relating thereto shall invalidate the election or the result thereof if notice thereof shall have been given substantially as herein provided and the election shall have been fairly conducted.

The commission shall publish the result of the election and shall thereafter consider and determine whether the operation of the district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible. If the commission determines that the operation of such district is not administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and deny the petition. If the commission determines that the operation of such district is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall record such determination and shall proceed with the organization of the district in the manner hereinafter provided. In making such determination the commission shall give due regard and weight to the attitudes of the owners of lands lying within the defined boundaries, the number of landowners and qualified electors eligible to vote in the election who shall have voted, the proportion of the votes cast in the election in favor of the creation of the district to the total number of votes cast, the approximate wealth and income of the landowners of the proposed district, the probable expense of carrying on erosion control and other conservation operations within such district, and such other economic and social factors as may be relevant to such determination, having due regard to the legislative determination set forth in section 22-2716, Idaho Code; provided however, the commission shall not have authority to determine that the operation of the proposed district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible unless at least a majority of the votes cast in the election upon the proposition of creation of the district shall have been cast in favor of the creation of such district.
(6) If the commission determines that the operation of the proposed district within the defined boundaries is administratively practicable and feasible, it shall appoint two (2) supervisors to act, with the three (3) supervisors elected as provided hereinafter, as the governing body of the district. Such district shall be a governmental subdivision of this state and a public body corporate and politic, upon the taking of the following proceedings:

The two (2) appointed supervisors shall present to the secretary of state an application signed by them which shall set forth (and such application need contain no detail other than the mere recitals): (i) that a petition for the creation of the district was filed with the state soil and water conservation commission pursuant to the provisions of this chapter and that the proceedings specified in this chapter were taken pursuant to such petition; that the application is being filed in order to complete the organization of the district as a governmental subdivision and a public body, corporate and politic, under this chapter; and that the commission has appointed them as supervisors; (ii) the name and official residence of each of the supervisors, together with a certified copy of the appointments evidencing their right to office; (iii) the term of office of each of the supervisors; (iv) the name which is proposed for the district; and (v) the location of the principal office of the supervisors of the district. The application shall be subscribed and sworn to by each of the said supervisors before an officer authorized by the laws of this state to take and certify oaths, who shall certify upon the application that he personally knows the supervisors and knows them to be the officers as affirmed in the application, and that each has subscribed thereto in the officer’s presence.

The application shall be accompanied by a statement by the state soil and water conservation commission, which shall certify (and such statement need contain no detail other than the mere recitals) that a petition was filed, notice issued and hearing held as aforesaid; that the commission did duly determine that there is need, in the interest of the public health, safety and welfare, for a soil conservation district to function in the proposed territory and did define the boundaries thereof; that notice was given and an election held on the question of the creation of such district, and that the result of the election showed a sixty percent (60%) majority of the votes cast in the election to be in favor of the creation of the district; that thereafter the commission did duly determine that the operation of the proposed district is administratively practicable and feasible. The said statement shall set forth the boundaries of the district as they have been defined by the commission.

The secretary of state shall examine the application and statement and, if he finds that the name proposed for the district is not identical with that of any other soil conservation district of this state or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion or uncertainty, he shall receive and file them and shall record them in an appropriate book of record in his office.

If the secretary of state finds that the name proposed for the district is identical with that of any other soil conservation district of this state, or so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, he shall certify such fact to the state soil and water conservation commission which shall thereupon submit to the secretary of state a new name for the said district, which shall not be subject to such defects. Upon receipt of such new name free of such defects, the secretary of state shall record the application and statement with the name so modified, in an appropriate book of record in his office. When the application and statement have been made, filed and recorded, as herein provided, the district shall constitute a governmental subdivision of this state and a public body corporate and politic. The secretary of state shall make and issue to the said supervisors a certificate under the seal of the state, of the due organization of the said district, and shall record such certificate with the application and statement. The boundaries of such district shall include the territory as determined by the state soil and water conservation commission as aforesaid, but in no event shall they include any area included within the boundaries of another soil conservation district organized under the provisions of this chapter except as provided in section 22-2720, Idaho Code.
(7) After six (6) months shall have expired from the date of entry of a determination by the state soil and water conservation commission that operation of a proposed district is not administratively practicable and feasible, and denial of a petition pursuant to such determination, subsequent petitions may be filed as aforesaid, and action taken thereon in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Where more than one (1) petition is filed covering parts of the same territory, the state soil and water conservation commission may consolidate all of any such petitions.

(8) Petitions for including additional territory within an existing district may be filed with the state soil and water conservation commission and the proceedings herein provided for in the case of petitions to organize a district shall be observed in the case of petitions for such inclusion. The commission shall prescribe the form for such petitions, which shall be as nearly as may be in the form prescribed in this chapter for petitions to organize a district. Where the total number of landowners in the area proposed for inclusion is less than twenty-five (25), the petition may be filed when signed by a two-thirds (2/3) majority of the owners of such area, and in such case no election need be held. In elections upon petitions for such inclusion, all owners of land and qualified electors lying within the proposed additional area shall be eligible to vote.

(9) Incorporated cities, not already included within a district, may be included by presentation of a request of the district approved by the governing body along with a request of the city approved by the mayor and council, to the state soil and water conservation commission. The commission shall consider and act on such joint request at the earliest convenience. If the joint request is denied, the commission shall so notify the district and city in writing and state the reasons for such denial. After six (6) months shall have expired from the date of denial of such joint request, a subsequent joint request may again be made. If the joint request is approved, the commission shall then cause the necessary papers to be filed with the secretary of state. This shall include an amended legal description of the boundaries of the total district.

History.

1957, ch. 218, § 5, p. 476; am. 1973, ch. 164, § 1, p. 310; am. 1995, ch. 118, § 8, p. 417; am. 2010, ch. 279, § 4, p. 719.